Hawaii statutes.
§490:4A-107 Federal reserve regulations and
operating circulars. Regulations of the Board of Governors of the Federal
Reserve System and operating circulars of the Federal Reserve Banks supersede
any inconsistent provision of this article to the extent of the inconsistency.
[L 1991, c 41, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next